Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB639.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 132 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) Notwithstanding any statutory provisions to the contrary, real property
owned by and maintained as the permanent residence of a veteran of the
Armed Forces of the United States who has a service-connected disability
rating adjudicated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs
shall be provided a homestead exemption on the assessed valuation of the
veteran's permanent residence and contiguous real property in accordance
with this section.
(b) 1. For veterans with a service-connected disability rating of at least ten
percent (10%), but less than thirty percent (30%), the homestead
exemption amount shall be equal to five thousand dollars ($5,000) of
the assessed value of the veteran's permanent residence and
contiguous real property.
2. For veterans with a service-connected disability rating of at least thirty
percent (30%), but less than fifty percent (50%), the homestead
exemption amount shall be equal to seven thousand five hundred
dollars ($7,500) of the assessed value of the veteran's permanent
residence and contiguous real property.
3. For veterans with a service-connected disability rating of at least fifty
percent (50%), but no more than seventy percent (70%), the
homestead exemption amount shall be equal to ten thousand dollars
($10,000) of the assessed value of the veteran's permanent residence
and contiguous real property.
4. For veterans with a service-connected disability rating of at least
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 2/17/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 891
seventy percent (70%), but less than one hundred percent (100%), the
homestead exemption amount shall be equal to twelve thousand
dollars ($12,000) of the assessed value of the veteran's permanent
residence and contiguous real property.
5. For veterans with a one hundred percent (100%) service-connected
disability, the homestead exemption amount shall be equal to one
hundred percent (100%) of the assessed value of the veteran's
permanent residence and contiguous real property up to an assessed
valuation of:
a. Two hundred forty thousand dollars ($240,000) for the 2026
assessment year;
b. Two hundred eighty thousand dollars ($280,000) for the 2027
assessment year;
c. Three hundred twenty thousand dollars ($320,000) for the 2028
assessment year;
d. Three hundred sixty thousand dollars ($360,000) for the 2029
assessment year; and
e. Four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) for the 2030
assessment year and every assessment year thereafter.
(c) Only one (1) homestead exemption per residential unit is allowed,
regardless of the number of veterans occupying the residence.
(d) The permanent residence and contiguous real property of the surviving
spouse of a veteran who qualified for a homestead exemption under this
section prior to his or her death shall continue to qualify for the homestead
exemption as long as:
1. The surviving spouse:
a. Was married to the veteran at the time of the veteran's death;
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 2/17/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 891
and
b. Has not remarried since the death of the veteran; and
2. The property:
a. Was the permanent residence of the surviving spouse at the time
of the veteran's death; and
b. Has been maintained as the permanent residence of the
surviving spouse since the veteran's death.
(2) The department shall prescribe forms and an application process for the
homestead exemption provided under this section.
(3) Notwithstanding any statutory provisions to the contrary, this section shall apply
to the assessment and taxation of real property for state, county, city, and special
district purposes.
(4) A mobile home, manufactured home, or recreational vehicle, when classified as
real property under KRS 132.751, or a modular house shall qualify as a
permanent residence for purposes of the homestead exemption provided under
this section.
(5) When title to real property that is exempted either in whole or in part under this
section is transferred, the owner, administrator, executor, trustee, guardian,
conservator, curator, or agent shall report the transfer to the property valuation
administrator.
(6) The real property may be held by legal or equitable title, by the entireties, jointly,
in common, as a condominium, or indirectly by the stock ownership or
membership representing the owner's or member's proprietary interest in a
corporation owning a fee or a leasehold initially in excess of ninety-eight (98)
years. The homestead exemption provided under this section shall apply only to
the value of the real property assessable to the owner or, in case of ownership
through stock or membership in a corporation, the value of the proportion which
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 2/17/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 891
his or her interest in the corporation bears to the assessed value of the property.
(7) Any owner making application and qualifying for the homestead exemption
provided under this section:
(a) Before payment of his or her property taxes for the assessment year in
question shall be entitled to a full or partial exoneration, as the case may be,
of the property tax due to reflect the taxable assessment after allowance for
the homestead exemption; or
(b) After property taxes have been paid for the assessment year in question
shall be entitled to a refund of the taxes paid applicable to the value of the
homestead exemption.
Section 2. This Act applies to property assessed on or after January 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 2/17/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed